Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska47-205
Jailers; reports; contents; filing.

The officer in charge of any municipal jail shall on or before the first day of February of each year, for the preceding calendar year, and at such other times as he or she may be required by the Jail Standards Board, make out a written report and cause copies to be filed with the city clerk and the clerk of the district court of the county where such municipality is located. Such report shall contain a summary of the records required to be kept by the officer as provided in section 47-204 and such other data and matters as may be required by the Jail Standards Board.

Laws 1915, c. 208, § 5, p. 463;

C.S.1922, § 3014;

C.S.1929, § 47-119;

R.S.1943, § 47-205;

Laws 1971, LB 271, § 2;

Laws 1996, LB 233, § 16.